Connecticut, session 2026, HB05482.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section,
"prescription hormone therapy" means all drugs approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration that are used to medically
suppress, increase or replace hormones that the body is not producing
at intended levels, as determined by the prescribing provider.
"Prescription hormone therapy" does not include glucagon-like peptide-
1 and glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonists.
(b) Each individual and group health insurance policy providing
coverage of the type specified in subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (11) and (12)
of section 38a-469 of the general statutes, delivered, issued for delivery,
renewed, amended or continued in this state on or after January 1, 2027,
that includes coverage for prescription hormone therapy shall provide
reimbursement for a twelve-month supply of covered prescription
hormone therapy and any necessary supplies for administration
HB5482 / File No. 427 1

HB5482 File No. 427
dispensed at one time, unless the (1) insured requests a smaller supply,
(2) prescribing provider instructs that the insured must receive a smaller
supply, or (3) prescription hormone therapy is a controlled substance. If
the prescription hormone therapy is a controlled substance, the health
plan shall provide reimbursement for the maximum refills allowed
under state and federal law to be obtained at one time by the insured.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits a health plan from limiting refills
that may be obtained in the last quarter of the plan year if a twelve-
month supply of the prescription hormone therapy has already been
dispensed during the plan year. To the extent not otherwise prohibited
under state or federal law, health plans may apply drug utilization
management strategies to prescription drugs covered under this section.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section, (1)
"medically necessary" has the same meaning as provided in section 17b-
259b of the general statutes; and (2) "prescription hormone therapy"
means all drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration that are used to medically suppress, increase or replace
hormones that the body is not producing at intended levels, as
determined by the prescribing provider. "Prescription hormone
therapy" does not include glucagon-like peptide-1 and glucagon-like
peptide-1 receptor agonists.
(b) The Commissioner of Social Services, to the extent permissible
under federal law, shall provide Medicaid coverage for a medically
necessary twelve-month supply of prescription hormone therapy and
any necessary supplies for administration dispensed at one time, unless
the (1) enrollee requests a smaller supply, (2) prescribing provider
instructs that the enrollee must receive a smaller supply, or (3)
prescription hormone therapy is a controlled substance. If the
prescription hormone therapy is a controlled substance, the
commissioner shall provide Medicaid coverage for the maximum refills
allowed under state and federal law to be obtained at one time by the
Medicaid enrollee.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) The Commissioner of Social
HB5482 / File No. 427 2

HB5482 File No. 427
Services, to the extent permissible under federal law, shall provide
Medicaid coverage for a twelve-month supply of any prescribed
contraceptive drug, device or product approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration and dispensed at one time, unless the
Medicaid enrollee or the enrollee's prescribing health care provider
requests less than a twelve-month supply of such contraceptive drug,
device or product.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 2 January 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 3 January 1, 2027 New section
HS Joint Favorable
HB5482 / File No. 427 3

HB5482 File No. 427
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires fully-insured plans to cover one-time, 12-month
dispensing of certain covered prescriptions except in specified
situations, resulting in no fiscal impact to the state.
HB5482 / File No. 427 4

HB5482 File No. 427
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5482
AN ACT CONCERNING TWELVE-MONTH COVERAGE FOR
CONTRACEPTION AND HORMONE THERAPY.